epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/grc.xml
	<patterns>
		α1
		ε1
		η1
		ι1
		ο1
		υ1
		ω1
		ϊ1
		ϋ1
		ἀ1
		ἁ1
		ἂ1
		ἃ1
		ἄ1
		ἅ1
		ἆ1
		ἇ1
		ἐ1
		ἑ1
		ἒ1
		ἓ1
		ἔ1
		ἕ1
		ἠ1
		ἡ1
		ἢ1
		ἣ1
		ἤ1
		ἥ1
		ἦ1
		ἧ1
		ἰ1
		ἱ1
		ἲ1
		ἳ1
		ἴ1
		ἵ1
		ἶ1
		ἷ1
		ὀ1
		ὁ1
		ὂ1
		ὃ1
		ὄ1
		ὅ1
		ὐ1
		ὑ1
		ὒ1
		ὓ1
		ὔ1
		ὕ1
		ὖ1
		ὗ1
		ὠ1
		ὡ1
		ὢ1
		ὣ1
		ὤ1
		ὥ1
		ὦ1
		ὧ1
		ὰ1
		ὲ1
		ὴ1
		ὶ1
		ὸ1
		ὺ1
		ὼ1
		ᾀ1
		ᾁ1
		ᾂ1
		ᾃ1
		ᾄ1
		ᾅ1
		ᾆ1
		ᾇ1
		ᾐ1
		ᾑ1
		ᾒ1
		ᾓ1
		ᾔ1
		ᾕ1
		ᾖ1
		ᾗ1
		ᾠ1
		ᾡ1
		ᾢ1
		ᾣ1
		ᾤ1
		ᾥ1
		ᾦ1
		ᾧ1
		ᾲ1
		ᾳ1
		ᾴ1
		ᾶ1
		ᾷ1
		ῂ1
		ῃ1
		ῄ1
		ῆ1
		ῇ1
		ῒ1
		ῖ1
		ῗ1
		ῢ1
		ῦ1
		ῧ1
		ῲ1
		ῳ1
		ῴ1
		ῶ1
		ῷ1
		ά1
		έ1
		ή1
		ί1
		ό1
		ύ1
		ώ1
		ΐ1
		ΰ1
		ά1
		έ1
		ή1
		ί1
		ό1
		ύ1
		ώ1
		ΐ1
		ΰ1
		α2ι
		α2ί
		α2ί
		α2ὶ
		α2ῖ
		α2ἰ
		α2ἴ
		α2ἲ
		α2ἶ
		α2ἱ
		α2ἵ
		α2ἳ
		α2ἷ
		ά3ι
		ά3ι
		ᾶ3ι
		ἀ3ι
		ἁ3ι
		α2υ
		α2ύ
		α2ύ
		α2ὺ
		α2ῦ
		α2ὐ
		α2ὔ
		α2ὒ
		α2ὖ
		α2ὑ
		α2ὕ
		α2ὓ
		α2ὗ
		ά3υ
		ά3υ
		ᾶ3υ
		ἀ3υ
		ἁ3υ
		ε2ι
		ε2ί
		ε2ί
		ε2ὶ
		ε2ῖ
		ε2ἰ
		ε2ἴ
		ε2ἲ
		ε2ἶ
		ε2ἱ
		ε2ἵ
		ε2ἳ
		ε2ἷ
		έ3ι
		έ3ι
		ἐ3ι
		ἑ3ι
		ε2υ
		ε2ύ
		ε2ύ
		ε2ὺ
		ε2ῦ
		ε2ὐ
		ε2ὔ
		ε2ὒ
		ε2ὖ
		ε2ὑ
		ε2ὕ
		ε2ὓ
		ε2ὗ
		έ3υ
		έ3υ
		ἑ3υ
		ἐ3υ
		η2υ
		η2ύ
		η2ύ
		η2ὺ
		η2ῦ
		η2ὐ
		η2ὔ
		η2ὒ
		η2ὖ
		η2ὑ
		η2ὕ
		η2ὓ
		η2ὗ
		ή3υ
		ή3υ
		ῆ3υ
		ἠ3υ
		ἡ3υ
		ο2ι
		ο2ί
		ο2ί
		ο2ὶ
		ο2ῖ
		ο2ἰ
		ο2ἴ
		ο2ἲ
		ο2ἶ
		ο2ἱ
		ο2ἵ
		ο2ἳ
		ο2ἷ
		ό3ι
		ό3ι
		ὀ3ι
		ὁ3ι
		ο2υ
		ο2ύ
		ο2ύ
		ο2ὺ
		ο2ῦ
		ο2ὐ
		ο2ὔ
		ο2ὒ
		ο2ὖ
		ο2ὑ
		ο2ὕ
		ο2ὓ
		ο2ὗ
		ό3υ
		ό3υ
		ὀ3υ
		ὁ3υ
		υ2ι
		υ2ί
		υ2ί
		υ2ὶ
		υ2ῖ
		υ2ἰ
		υ2ἴ
		υ2ἲ
		υ2ἶ
		υ2ἱ
		υ2ἵ
		υ2ἳ
		υ2ἷ
		ύ3ι
		ύ3ι
		ῦ3ι
		ὐ3ι
		ὑ3ι
		ου3ι
		όυ4ι
		όυ4ι
		ὀυ4ι
		ὁυ4ι
		ο3υί
		ο3υί
		ο3υῖ
		4β.
		4γ.
		4δ.
		4ζ.
		4θ.
		4κ.
		4λ.
		4μ.
		4ν.
		4ξ.
		4π.
		4ρ.
		4σ.
		4ϲ.
		4ς.
		4τ.
		4φ.
		4χ.
		4ψ.
		4’
		4ʼ
		4᾿
		4β’
		4βʼ
		4β᾿
		4γ’
		4γʼ
		4γ᾿
		4δ’
		4δʼ
		4δ᾿
		4ζ’
		4ζʼ
		4ζ᾿
		4θ’
		4θʼ
		4θ᾿
		4κ’
		4κʼ
		4κ᾿
		4λ’
		4λʼ
		4λ᾿
		4μ’
		4μʼ
		4μ᾿
		4ν’
		4νʼ
		4ν᾿
		4ξ’
		4ξʼ
		4ξ᾿
		4π’
		4πʼ
		4π᾿
		4ρ’
		4ρʼ
		4ρ᾿
		4σ’
		4σʼ
		4σ᾿
		4ϲ’
		4ϲʼ
		4ϲ᾿
		4τ’
		4τʼ
		4τ᾿
		4φ’
		4φʼ
		4φ᾿
		4χ’
		4χʼ
		4χ᾿
		4ψ’
		4ψʼ
		4ψ᾿
		.β4
		.γ4
		.δ4
		.ζ4
		.θ4
		.κ4
		.λ4
		.μ4
		.ν4
		.ξ4
		.π4
		.ρ4
		.σ4
		.ϲ4
		.τ4
		.φ4
		.χ4
		.ψ4
		2β1β
		2γ1γ
		2δ1δ
		2ζ1ζ
		2θ1θ
		2κ1κ
		2λ1λ
		2μ1μ
		2ν1ν
		2π1π
		2ρ1ρ
		2ῤ1ῥ
		2σ1σ
		2ϲ1ϲ
		2τ1τ
		2φ1φ
		2χ1χ
		2ψ1ψ
		2β1γ
		2β1ζ
		2β1θ
		2β1κ
		2β1ξ
		2β1π
		2β1σ
		2β1ϲ
		2β1τ
		2β1φ
		2β1χ
		2β1ψ
		2γ1β
		2γ1ζ
		2γ1θ
		2γ1κ
		2γ1ξ
		2γ1π
		2γ1σ
		2γ1ϲ
		2γ1τ
		2γ1φ
		2γ1χ
		2γ1ψ
		2δ1β
		2δ1γ
		2δ1ζ
		2δ1θ
		2δ1κ
		2δ1λ
		2δ1ξ
		2δ1π
		2δ1σ
		2δ1ϲ
		2δ1τ
		2δ1φ
		2δ1χ
		2δ1ψ
		2ζ1β
		2ζ1γ
		2ζ1δ
		2ζ1θ
		2ζ1κ
		2ζ1λ
		2ζ1μ
		2ζ1ν
		2ζ1ξ
		2ζ1π
		2ζ1ρ
		2ζ1σ
		2ζ1ϲ
		2ζ1τ
		2ζ1φ
		2ζ1χ
		2ζ1ψ
		2θ1β
		2θ1γ
		2θ1δ
		2θ1ζ
		2θ1κ
		2θ1ξ
		2θ1π
		2θ1σ
		2θ1ϲ
		2θ1τ
		2θ1φ
		2θ1χ
		2θ1ψ
		2κ1β
		2κ1γ
		2κ1δ
		2κ1ζ
		2κ1θ
		2κ1ξ
		2κ1π
		2κ1σ
		2κ1ϲ
		2κ1φ
		2κ1χ
		2κ1ψ
		2λ1β
		2λ1γ
		2λ1δ
		2λ1ζ
		2λ1θ
		2λ1κ
		2λ1μ
		2λ1ν
		2λ1ξ
		2λ1π
		2λ1ρ
		2λ1σ
		2λ1ϲ
		2λ1τ
		2λ1φ
		2λ1χ
		2λ1ψ
		2μ1β
		2μ1γ
		2μ1δ
		2μ1ζ
		2μ1θ
		2μ1κ
		2μ1λ
		2μ1ξ
		2μ1π
		2μ1ρ
		2μ1σ
		2μ1ϲ
		2μ1τ
		2μ1φ
		2μ1χ
		2μ1ψ
		2ν1β
		2ν1γ
		2ν1δ
		2ν1ζ
		2ν1θ
		2ν1κ
		2ν1λ
		2ν1μ
		2ν1ξ
		2ν1π
		2ν1ρ
		2ν1σ
		2ν1ϲ
		2νς.
		2νϲ.
		2ν1τ
		2ν1φ
		2ν1χ
		2ν1ψ
		2ξ1β
		2ξ1γ
		2ξ1δ
		2ξ1ζ
		2ξ1θ
		2ξ1κ
		2ξ1λ
		2ξ1μ
		2ξ1ν
		2ξ1π
		2ξ1ρ
		2ξ1σ
		2ξ1ϲ
		2ξ1τ
		2ξ1φ
		2ξ1χ
		2ξ1ψ
		2π1β
		2π1γ
		2π1δ
		2π1ζ
		2π1θ
		2π1κ
		2π1ξ
		2π1σ
		2π1ϲ
		2π1φ
		2π1χ
		2π1ψ
		2ρ1β
		2ρ1γ
		2ρ1δ
		2ρ1ζ
		2ρ1θ
		2ρ1κ
		2ρ1λ
		2ρ1μ
		2ρ1ν
		2ρ1ξ
		2ρ1π
		2ρ1σ
		2ρ1ϲ
		2ρ1τ
		2ρ1φ
		2ρ1χ
		2ρ1ψ
		2σ1δ
		2ϲ1δ
		2σ1ζ
		2ϲ1ζ
		2σ1λ
		2ϲ1λ
		2σ1ν
		2ϲ1ν
		2σ1ξ
		2ϲ1ξ
		2σ1ρ
		2ϲ1ρ
		2σ1ψ
		2ϲ1ψ
		2τ1β
		2τ1γ
		2τ1δ
		2τ1ζ
		2τ1θ
		2τ1κ
		2τ1ξ
		2τ1π
		2τ1σ
		2τ1ϲ
		2τ1φ
		2τ1χ
		2τ1ψ
		2φ1β
		2φ1γ
		2φ1δ
		2φ1ζ
		2φ1κ
		2φ1ξ
		2φ1π
		2φ1σ
		2φ1ϲ
		2φ1τ
		2φ1χ
		2φ1ψ
		2χ1β
		2χ1γ
		2χ1δ
		2χ1ζ
		2χ1κ
		2χ1ξ
		2χ1π
		2χ1σ
		2χ1ϲ
		2χ1τ
		2χ1φ
		2χ1ψ
		2ψ1β
		2ψ1γ
		2ψ1δ
		2ψ1ζ
		2ψ1θ
		2ψ1κ
		2ψ1λ
		2ψ1μ
		2ψ1ν
		2ψ1ξ
		2ψ1π
		2ψ1ρ
		2ψ1σ
		2ψ1ϲ
		2ψ1τ
		2ψ1φ
		2ψ1χ
		4βδ’
		4βδ’
		4βδʼ
		4βδ᾽
		4βδ᾿
		4βλ’
		4βλ’
		4βλʼ
		4βλ᾽
		4βλ᾿
		4βμ’
		4βμ’
		4βμʼ
		4βμ᾽
		4βμ᾿
		4βν’
		4βν’
		4βνʼ
		4βν᾽
		4βν᾿
		4βρ’
		4βρ’
		4βρʼ
		4βρ᾽
		4βρ᾿
		4γδ’
		4γδ’
		4γδʼ
		4γδ᾽
		4γδ᾿
		4γλ’
		4γλ’
		4γλʼ
		4γλ᾽
		4γλ᾿
		4γμ’
		4γμ’
		4γμʼ
		4γμ᾽
		4γμ᾿
		4γν’
		4γν’
		4γνʼ
		4γν᾽
		4γν᾿
		4γρ’
		4γρ’
		4γρʼ
		4γρ᾽
		4γρ᾿
		4δμ’
		4δμ’
		4δμʼ
		4δμ᾽
		4δμ᾿
		4δν’
		4δν’
		4δνʼ
		4δν᾽
		4δν᾿
		4δρ’
		4δρ’
		4δρʼ
		4δρ᾽
		4δρ᾿
		4ζβ’
		4ζβ’
		4ζβʼ
		4ζβ᾽
		4ζβ᾿
		4θλ’
		4θλ’
		4θλʼ
		4θλ᾽
		4θλ᾿
		4λμ’
		4λμ’
		4λμʼ
		4λμ᾽
		4λμ᾿
		4θν’
		4θν’
		4θνʼ
		4θν᾽
		4θν᾿
		4θρ’
		4θρ’
		4θρʼ
		4θρ᾽
		4θρ᾿
		4κλ’
		4κλ’
		4κλʼ
		4κλ᾽
		4κλ᾿
		4κμ’
		4κμ’
		4κμʼ
		4κμ᾽
		4κμ᾿
		4κν’
		4κν’
		4κνʼ
		4κν᾽
		4κν᾿
		4κρ’
		4κρ’
		4κρʼ
		4κρ᾽
		4κρ᾿
		4κτ’
		4κτ’
		4κτʼ
		4κτ᾽
		4κτ᾿
		4μν’
		4μν’
		4μνʼ
		4μν᾽
		4μν᾿
		4πλ’
		4πλ’
		4πλʼ
		4πλ᾽
		4πλ᾿
		4πμ’
		4πμ’
		4πμʼ
		4πμ᾽
		4πμ᾿
		4πν’
		4πν’
		4πνʼ
		4πν᾽
		4πν᾿
		4πρ’
		4πρ’
		4πρʼ
		4πρ᾽
		4πρ᾿
		4πτ’
		4πτ’
		4πτʼ
		4πτ᾽
		4πτ᾿
		4σβ’
		4σβ’
		4σβʼ
		4σβ᾽
		4σβ᾿
		4ϲβ’
		4ϲβ’
		4ϲβʼ
		4ϲβ᾽
		4ϲβ᾿
		4σγ’
		4σγ’
		4σγʼ
		4σγ᾽
		4σγ᾿
		4ϲγ’
		4ϲγ’
		4ϲγʼ
		4ϲγ᾽
		4ϲγ᾿
		4σδ’
		4σδ’
		4σδʼ
		4σδ᾽
		4σδ᾿
		4ϲδ’
		4ϲδ’
		4ϲδʼ
		4ϲδ᾽
		4ϲδ᾿
		4σθ’
		4σθ’
		4σθʼ
		4σθ᾽
		4σθ᾿
		4ϲθ’
		4ϲθ’
		4ϲθʼ
		4ϲθ᾽
		4ϲθ᾿
		4σκ’
		4σκ’
		4σκʼ
		4σκ᾽
		4σκ᾿
		4ϲκ’
		4ϲκ’
		4ϲκʼ
		4ϲκ᾽
		4ϲκ᾿
		4σμ’
		4σμ’
		4σμʼ
		4σμ᾽
		4σμ᾿
		4ϲμ’
		4ϲμ’
		4ϲμʼ
		4ϲμ᾽
		4ϲμ᾿
		4σπ’
		4σπ’
		4σπʼ
		4σπ᾽
		4σπ᾿
		4ϲπ’
		4ϲπ’
		4ϲπʼ
		4ϲπ᾽
		4ϲπ᾿
		4στ’
		4στ’
		4στʼ
		4στ᾽
		4στ᾿
		4ϲτ’
		4ϲτ’
		4ϲτʼ
		4ϲτ᾽
		4ϲτ᾿
		4σφ’
		4σφ’
		4σφʼ
		4σφ᾽
		4σφ᾿
		4ϲφ’
		4ϲφ’
		4ϲφʼ
		4ϲφ᾽
		4ϲφ᾿
		4σχ’
		4σχ’
		4σχʼ
		4σχ᾽
		4σχ᾿
		4ϲχ’
		4ϲχ’
		4ϲχʼ
		4ϲχ᾽
		4ϲχ᾿
		4φθ’
		4φθ’
		4φθʼ
		4φθ᾽
		4φθ᾿
		4φλ’
		4φλ’
		4φλʼ
		4φλ᾽
		4φλ᾿
		4φμ’
		4φμ’
		4φμʼ
		4φμ᾽
		4φμ᾿
		4φν’
		4φν’
		4φνʼ
		4φν᾽
		4φν᾿
		4φρ’
		4φρ’
		4φρʼ
		4φρ᾽
		4φρ᾿
		4χθ’
		4χθ’
		4χθʼ
		4χθ᾽
		4χθ᾿
		4χλ’
		4χλ’
		4χλʼ
		4χλ᾽
		4χλ᾿
		4χμ’
		4χμ’
		4χμʼ
		4χμ᾽
		4χμ᾿
		4χν’
		4χν’
		4χνʼ
		4χν᾽
		4χν᾿
		4χρ’
		4χρ’
		4χρʼ
		4χρ᾽
		4χρ᾿
		ἀγω2ν1άρ
		ἀγω2ν1άρ
		ἀγω2ν1αρ
		ἀδιέ2ξ1
		ἀδιέ2ξ1
		ἀδιε2ξ1
		ἀδυ2σ1ώ
		ἀδυ2σ1ώ
		ἀδυ2ϲ1ώ
		ἀδυ2ϲ1ώ
		ἀδυ2σ1ω
		ἀδυ2ϲ1ω
		ἁλό2σ1
		ἁλό2σ1
		ἁλό2ϲ1
		ἁλό2ϲ1
		ἁλο2σ1
		ἁλο2ϲ1
		ἀμπαλί2ν1
		ἀμπαλί2ν1
		ἀμπαλι2ν1
		ἀμφί2σ1β
		ἀμφί2σ1β
		ἀμφί2ϲ1β
		ἀμφί2ϲ1β
		ἀμφι2σ1β
		ἀμφι2ϲ1β
		ἀμφί2σ1ω
		ἀμφί2σ1ω
		ἀμφί2ϲ1ω
		ἀμφί2ϲ1ω
		ἀμφι2σ1ώ
		ἀμφι2σ1ώ
		ἀμφι2ϲ1ώ
		ἀμφι2ϲ1ώ
		ἀ2ν1αγής.
		ἀ2ν1αγής.
		ἀ2ν1αγήϲ.
		ἀ2ν1αγήϲ.
		ἀ2ν1αγὴς.
		ἀ2ν1αγὴϲ.
		ἀ2ν1αγήσ.
		ἀ2ν1αγήσ.
		ἀ2ν1αγὴσ.
		ἀ2ν1αγο
		ἀ2ν1αγεῖ.
		ἀ2ν1αγῆ.
		ἀ2ν1αγές.
		ἀ2ν1αγές.
		ἀ2ν1αγέϲ.
		ἀ2ν1αγέϲ.
		ἀ2ν1αγὲς.
		ἀ2ν1αγὲϲ.
		ἀ2ν1αγέσ.
		ἀ2ν1αγέσ.
		ἀ2ν1αγὲσ.
		ἀ2ν1αγεῖς.
		ἀ2ν1αγεῖϲ.
		ἀ2ν1αγεῖσ.
		ἀ2ν1αγῶν.
		ἀ2ν1αγέσι
		ἀ2ν1αγέσι
		ἀ2ν1αγέϲι
		ἀ2ν1αγέϲι
		ἀ2ν1αγῆ
		ἀ2ν1άγκυ
		ἀ2ν1άγκυ
		ἀ2ν1αγκύ
		ἀ2ν1αγκύ
		ἄ2ν1αγν
		ἀ2ν1άγν
		ἀ2ν1άγν
		ἀ2ν1αγν
		ἀ3ν2αγνά
		ἀ3ν2αγνά
		ἀ3ν2αγνω
		ἀ3ν2άγνω
		ἀ3ν2άγνω
		ἀ3ν2αγνώ
		ἀ3ν2αγνώ
		ἀ2ν1αγρί
		ἀ2ν1αγρί
		ἀ2ν1αγρῖ
		ἀ2ν1αγρι
		ἀ2ν1άγωγ
		ἀ2ν1άγωγ
		ἀ2ν1αγώγ
		ἀ2ν1αγώγ
		ἀ3ν2αγώγι
		ἀ3ν2αγώγι
		ἀ3ν2αγωγί
		ἀ3ν2αγωγί
		ἀ4ν3αγωγία
		ἀ4ν3αγωγία
		ἀ2ν1άδελ
		ἀ2ν1άδελ
		ἀ2ν1αδέλ
		ἀ2ν1αδέλ
		ἀ2ν1άελπ
		ἀ2ν1άελπ
		ἀ2ν1αέλπ
		ἀ2ν1αέλπ
		ἄ2ν1αθλ
		ἀ2ν1άθλ
		ἀ2ν1άθλ
		ἀ2ν1αίδ
		ἀ2ν1αίδ
		ἀ2ν1αιδ
		ἄ2ν1αιμ
		ἀ2ν1αίμ
		ἀ2ν1αίμ
		ἀ2ν1αιμ
		ἀ2ν1αίσθ
		ἀ2ν1αίσθ
		ἀ2ν1αίϲθ
		ἀ2ν1αίϲθ
		ἀ2ν1αισθ
		ἀ2ν1αιϲθ
		ἀ2ν1αισι
		ἀ2ν1αιϲι
		ἀ2ν1αισί
		ἀ2ν1αισί
		ἀ2ν1αιϲί
		ἀ2ν1αιϲί
		ἀ2ν1αίσχ
		ἀ2ν1αίσχ
		ἀ2ν1αίϲχ
		ἀ2ν1αίϲχ
		ἀ2ν1αισχ
		ἀ2ν1αιϲχ
		ἀ2ν1αίτ
		ἀ2ν1αίτ
		ἀ2ν1αιτ
		ἀ2ν1άκαν
		ἀ2ν1άκαν
		ἀ2ν1ακάν
		ἀ2ν1ακάν
		ἀ2ν1ακόλο
		ἀ2ν1ακόλο
		ἀ2ν1ακολο
		ἀ2ν1αλγ
		ἀ2ν1αλδ
		ἀ3ν2αλδα
		ἀ3ν2αλδήσκ
		ἀ3ν2αλδήσκ
		ἀ3ν2αλδήϲκ
		ἀ3ν2αλδήϲκ
		ἀ2ν1άλειπ
		ἀ2ν1άλειπ
		ἀ2ν1αλείπ
		ἀ2ν1αλείπ
		ἀ2ν1αλειφ
		ἀ2ν1άλειφ
		ἀ2ν1άλειφ
		ἀ2ν1αλείφ
		ἀ2ν1αλείφ
		ἀ2ν1αλήθ
		ἀ2ν1αλήθ
		ἀ2ν1αληθ
		ἀ2ν1άλθ
		ἀ2ν1άλθ
		ἀ2ν1αλθ
		ἀ2ν1άλιπ
		ἀ2ν1άλιπ
		ἀ2ν1αλίπ
		ἀ2ν1αλίπ
		ἀ2ν1άλιστ
		ἀ2ν1άλιστ
		ἀ2ν1άλιϲτ
		ἀ2ν1άλιϲτ
		ἀ2ν1αλίστ
		ἀ2ν1αλίστ
		ἀ2ν1αλίϲτ
		ἀ2ν1αλίϲτ
		ἀ2ν1αλκ
		ἄ2ν1αλκ
		ἀ2ν1άλκ
		ἀ2ν1άλκ
		ἀ2ν1άλλ
		ἀ2ν1άλλ
		ἀ2ν1αλλ
		ἀ3ν2άλλο
		ἀ3ν2άλλο
		ἀ3ν2άλλε
		ἀ3ν2άλλε
		ἄ2ν1αλμ
		ἀ2ν1άλμ
		ἀ2ν1άλμ
		ἀ2ν1αλμ
		ἄ2ν1αλο
		ἀ2ν1άλου
		ἀ2ν1άλου
		ἀ2ν1άλῳ.
		ἀ2ν1άλῳ.
		ἄ2ν1αλε.
		ἀ2ν1άλοι
		ἀ2ν1άλοι
		ἀ2ν1άλων.
		ἀ2ν1άλων.
		ἄ2ν1αλτ
		ἀ2ν1άλτ
		ἀ2ν1άλτ
		ἀ2ν1αμάξ
		ἀ2ν1αμάξ
		ἀ2ν1αμαξ
		ἀ2ν1αμάρτ
		ἀ2ν1αμάρτ
		ἀ2ν1αμαρτ
		ἀ2ν1αμέλγ
		ἀ2ν1αμέλγ
		ἀ2ν1αμελγ
		ἀ2ν1αμπ
		ἀ2ν1άμπ
		ἀ2ν1άμπ
		ἀ2ν1αμφ
		ἀναμφι2σ1
		ἀναμφι2ϲ1
		ἀ2ν1ανάγκ
		ἀ2ν1ανάγκ
		ἀ2ν1αναγκ
		ἄ2ν1ανδ
		ἀ2ν1άνδ
		ἀ2ν1άνδ
		ἀ2ν1ανθ
		ἀ3ν2ανθέ
		ἀ3ν2ανθέ
		ἀ4ν3ανθές.
		ἀ4ν3ανθές.
		ἀ4ν3ανθέϲ.
		ἀ4ν3ανθέϲ.
		ἀ4ν3ανθὲς.
		ἀ4ν3ανθὲϲ.
		ἀ4ν3ανθέσ.
		ἀ4ν3ανθέσ.
		ἀ4ν3ανθὲσ.
		ἀ4ν3ανθέσι
		ἀ4ν3ανθέσι
		ἀ4ν3ανθέϲι
		ἀ4ν3ανθέϲι
		ἀ2ν1άνιο
		ἀ2ν1άνιο
		ἀ2ν1ανίο
		ἀ2ν1ανίο
		ἀ2ν1ανίω
		ἀ2ν1ανίω
		ἀ2ν1ανταγ
		ἀ2ν1ανταπ
		ἀ2ν1αντί
		ἀ2ν1αντί
		ἀ2ν1αντι
		ἀνα2ξ1αγ
		ἀνά2ξ1αν
		ἀνά2ξ1αν
		ἀνα2ξ1άν
		ἀνα2ξ1άν
		ἀνα2ξ1αν
		ἀνά2ξ1αρ
		ἀνά2ξ1αρ
		ἀνα2ξ1άρ
		ἀνα2ξ1άρ
		ἀνά2ξ1ιπ
		ἀνά2ξ1ιπ
		ἀνα2ξ1ίπ
		ἀνα2ξ1ίπ
		ἀ2ν1αξιόλ
		ἀ2ν1αξιόλ
		ἀ2ν1αξιολ
		ἀ2ν1αξιόπ
		ἀ2ν1αξιόπ
		ἀ2ν1αξιοπ
		ἀ2ν1άξιο
		ἀ2ν1άξιο
		ἀ2ν1αξίο
		ἀ2ν1αξίο
		ἀ2ν1αξίω
		ἀ2ν1αξίω
		ἀ2ν1αξία
		ἀ2ν1αξία
		ἀ2ν1αξῖα
		ἀ2ν1απάλλα
		ἀ2ν1απάλλα
		ἀ2ν1απαλλά
		ἀ2ν1απαλλά
		ἀ2ν1απάρτ
		ἀ2ν1απάρτ
		ἀ2ν1απαρτ
		ἀ2ν1απαύδ
		ἀ2ν1απαύδ
		ἀ2ν1απαυδ
		ἀ2ν1απόβ
		ἀ2ν1απόβ
		ἀ2ν1αποβ
		ἀ2ν1απόγ
		ἀ2ν1απόγ
		ἀ2ν1απογ
		ἀ2ν1αποδή
		ἀ2ν1αποδή
		ἀ2ν1αποδη
		ἀ2ν1απόδο
		ἀ2ν1απόδο
		ἀ2ν1αποδό
		ἀ2ν1αποδό
		ἀ2ν1απόδρ
		ἀ2ν1απόδρ
		ἀ2ν1αποδρ
		ἀ2ν1απόλαυ
		ἀ2ν1απόλαυ
		ἀ2ν1απολαύ
		ἀ2ν1απολαύ
		ἀ2ν1απολό
		ἀ2ν1απολό
		ἀ2ν1απολο
		ἀ2ν1απόλυ
		ἀ2ν1απόλυ
		ἀ2ν1απολύ
		ἀ2ν1απολύ
		ἀ2ν1απόν
		ἀ2ν1απόν
		ἀ2ν1απον
		ἀ2ν1απόπ
		ἀ2ν1απόπ
		ἀ2ν1αποπ
		ἀ2ν1απόσ
		ἀ2ν1απόσ
		ἀ2ν1απόϲ
		ἀ2ν1απόϲ
		ἀ2ν1αποσ
		ἀ2ν1αποϲ
		ἀ2ν1απότε
		ἀ2ν1απότε
		ἀ2ν1αποτε
		ἀ2ν1απότμ
		ἀ2ν1απότμ
		ἀ2ν1αποτμ
		ἀ2ν1απότρ
		ἀ2ν1απότρ
		ἀ2ν1αποτρ
		ἀ2ν1αρά
		ἀ2ν1αρά
		ἀ2ν1αρα
		ἀ2ν1άρ
		ἀ2ν1άρ
		ἀ2ν1αρ
		ἄ2ν1αρ
		ἀ3ν2αρίτ
		ἀ3ν2αρίτ
		ἀ3ν2αρῖτ
		ἀ3ν2αριτ
		ἀ3ν2αρπ
		ἀ3ν2άρρ
		ἀ3ν2άρρ
		ἀ3ν2αρρ
		ἀ4ν3αρραγ
		ἀ3ν2αρτ
		ἀ3ν2αρύτ
		ἀ3ν2αρύτ
		ἀ2ν1άσκη
		ἀ2ν1άσκη
		ἀ2ν1άϲκη
		ἀ2ν1άϲκη
		ἀ2ν1ασκή
		ἀ2ν1ασκή
		ἀ2ν1αϲκή
		ἀ2ν1αϲκή
		ἄ2ν1ασπι
		ἄ2ν1αϲπι
		ἀ2ν1ασπί
		ἀ2ν1ασπί
		ἀ2ν1αϲπί
		ἀ2ν1αϲπί
		ἀ2ν1άσσατ
		ἀ2ν1άσσατ
		ἀ2ν1άϲϲατ
		ἀ2ν1άϲϲατ
		ἀ2ν1ασσάτ
		ἀ2ν1ασσάτ
		ἀ2ν1αϲϲάτ
		ἀ2ν1αϲϲάτ
		ἀ2ν1άστει
		ἀ2ν1άστει
		ἀ2ν1άϲτει
		ἀ2ν1άϲτει
		ἀ2ν1αστεί
		ἀ2ν1αστεί
		ἀ2ν1αϲτεί
		ἀ2ν1αϲτεί
		ἀ3ν2αστείβ
		ἀ3ν2αστείβ
		ἀ3ν2αϲτείβ
		ἀ3ν2αϲτείβ
		ἀ3ν2άστειρ
		ἀ3ν2άστειρ
		ἀ3ν2άϲτειρ
		ἀ3ν2άϲτειρ
		ἀ3ν2αστείρ
		ἀ3ν2αστείρ
		ἀ3ν2αϲτείρ
		ἀ3ν2αϲτείρ
		ἀ3ν2άστειχ
		ἀ3ν2άστειχ
		ἀ3ν2άϲτειχ
		ἀ3ν2άϲτειχ
		ἀ3ν2αστείχ
		ἀ3ν2αστείχ
		ἀ3ν2αϲτείχ
		ἀ3ν2αϲτείχ
		ἀ2ν1ατεὶ.
		ἀ2ν1ατεί.
		ἀ2ν1ατεί.
		ἀ2ν1ατὶ.
		ἀ2ν1ατί.
		ἀ2ν1ατί.
		ἄ2ν1ατος.
		ἄ2ν1ατοϲ.
		ἄ2ν1ατοσ.
		ἀ2ν1άτου.
		ἀ2ν1άτου.
		ἀ2ν1άτω
		ἀ2ν1άτω
		ἄ2ν1ατον.
		ἄ2ν1ατε
		ἄ2ν1ατοι.
		ἀ2ν1άτοις.
		ἀ2ν1άτοις.
		ἀ2ν1άτοιϲ.
		ἀ2ν1άτοιϲ.
		ἀ2ν1άτοισ.
		ἀ2ν1άτοισ.
		ἀ2ν1άττ
		ἀ2ν1άττ
		ἀ2ν1αττ
		ἀ2ν1αύγ
		ἀ2ν1αύγ
		ἀ2ν1αυγ
		ἀ2ν1αύδ
		ἀ2ν1αύδ
		ἀ2ν1αυδ
		ἀ3ν2αυδί
		ἀ3ν2αυδί
		ἀ3ν2αυδι
		ἄ2ν1αυδ
		ἄ2ν1αυλ
		ἀ2ν1αύλ
		ἀ2ν1αύλ
		ἀ2ν1αύξ
		ἀ2ν1αύξ
		ἀ2ν1αυξ
		ἀ2ν1αύχ
		ἀ2ν1αύχ
		ἀ2ν1αυχ
		ἀ2ν1αφαίρ
		ἀ2ν1αφαίρ
		ἀ2ν1αφαιρ
		ἀ2ν1αφή
		ἀ2ν1αφή
		ἀ2ν1αφὴ
		ἀ2ν1αφοῦ
		ἀ2ν1αφῆ
		ἀ2ν1αφεῖ
		ἀ2ν1αφοῖ
		ἀ2ν1εφῶν.
		ἀ2ν1αφέ
		ἀ2ν1αφέ
		ἀ2ν1αφὲ
		ἀ3ν2αφῆν
		ἀ2ν1αφρόδ
		ἀ2ν1αφρόδ
		ἀ2ν1αφροδ
		ἄ2ν1αφρ
		ἀ2ν1άφρ
		ἀ2ν1άφρ
		ἀ2ν1αχύρ
		ἀ2ν1αχύρ
		ἀ2ν1αχυρ
		ἀνδρό2σ1α
		ἀνδρό2σ1α
		ἀνδρό2ϲ1α
		ἀνδρό2ϲ1α
		ἀνδρο2σ1α
		ἀνδρο2ϲ1α
		ἀ2ν1έγγ
		ἀ2ν1έγγ
		ἀ2ν1εγγ
		ἀ2ν1έγερτ
		ἀ2ν1έγερτ
		ἀ2ν1εγέρτ
		ἀ2ν1εγέρτ
		ἀ2ν1εγκ
		ἀ2ν1έγκ
		ἀ2ν1έγκ
		ἀ2ν1εγχ
		ἀ2ν1εδά
		ἀ2ν1εδά
		ἀ2ν1εδα
		ἀ2ν1έδεσ
		ἀ2ν1έδεσ
		ἀ2ν1έδεϲ
		ἀ2ν1έδεϲ
		ἀ2ν1εδέσ
		ἀ2ν1εδέσ
		ἀ2ν1εδέϲ
		ἀ2ν1εδέϲ
		ἀ2ν1έδρασ
		ἀ2ν1έδρασ
		ἀ2ν1έδραϲ
		ἀ2ν1έδραϲ
		ἀ2ν1εδράσ
		ἀ2ν1εδράσ
		ἀ2ν1εδράϲ
		ἀ2ν1εδράϲ
		ἀ2ν1εέρ
		ἀ2ν1εέρ
		ἀ2ν1εερ
		ἀ2ν1εθέλ
		ἀ2ν1εθέλ
		ἀ2ν1εθελ
		ἀ2ν1έθι
		ἀ2ν1έθι
		ἀ2ν1εθί
		ἀ2ν1εθί
		ἀ2ν1είδε
		ἀ2ν1είδε
		ἀ2ν1ειδέ
		ἀ2ν1ειδέ
		ἀ2ν1είδω
		ἀ2ν1είδω
		ἀ2ν1ειδώ
		ἀ2ν1ειδώ
		ἀ2ν1είκα
